Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-565
United States Senator; vacancy; how filled.

(1) When a vacancy occurs in the representation of the State of Nebraska in the Senate of the United States, the office shall be filled by the Governor. The Governor shall appoint a suitable person possessing the qualifications necessary for senator to fill such vacancy.

(2)(a) If the vacancy occurs on or after August 1 prior to a statewide general election and if the term vacated expires on the following January 3, the appointee shall serve until the following January 3.

(b) If the vacancy occurs on or after August 1 prior to a statewide general election and if the term extends beyond the following January 3, the appointee shall serve until January 3 following the second statewide general election next succeeding the vacancy and at such election a senator shall be elected to serve the unexpired term if any.

(c) If the vacancy occurs at any time not described in subdivision (a) or (b) of this subsection, the appointee shall serve until January 3 following the next statewide general election next succeeding the vacancy and at such election a senator shall be elected to serve the unexpired term if any.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 161;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 52;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 23.